New York, session 2025-2026, S3021.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1626 of the vehicle and traffic law, as added by 2 chapter 420 of the laws of 1968, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 1626. Regulation of rest and parking areas and scenic overlooks. 1. 4 The department of transportation with respect to rest and parking areas 5 and scenic overlooks provided by the department of transportation along 6 state highways maintained by the state, may prohibit, restrict or regu- 7 late traffic within such areas and overlooks or the use of such areas 8 and overlooks. Any action taken pursuant to this section shall supersede 9 the provisions of this chapter where inconsistent or in conflict there- 10 with in respect to the establishment of maximum and minimum speed limits 11 and to the parking, standing, stopping and backing of vehicles. 12 2. No rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall 13 prohibit or restrict the possession of a concealed firearm by any indi- 14 vidual with a valid permit to have and carry a concealed firearm in this 15 state. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06925-01-5